Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1931.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 40 O.S. 2021, Section 4-102, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 4-102. COMPOSITION. A. There is hereby created a
Commission to be known as the Oklahoma Employment Security
Commission. The Commission shall consist of five (5) eight (8)
members, appointed by the Governor, by and with the consent of the
Oklahoma State Senate, two of whom shall represent employers, two
shall represent employees, and one shall represent the public. The
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1931 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

repr esentative of the public shall be the Chairman of the
Commission. New appointments shall be made within ninety (90) days
after any vacancy occurs in the membership. as follows:
1. One member of the public, appointed by the Governor, who
shall serve as the chair of the Commission;
2. One member, appointed by the Governor, who represents a
business located in a county of this state with a population of less
than fifty thousand (50,000) according to the most recent Federal
Decennial Census;
3. One member, appointed by the Governor, who represents a
business located in a county of this state with a population of more
than fifty thousand (50,000) according to the most recent Federal
Decennial Census;
4. One member, appointed by the Governor, who is employed by a
business with fewer than one hundred employees;
5. One member, appointed by the Governor, who is employed by a
business with more than one hundred employees;
6. One member, appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the
Senate, who shall represent a business located in this state with
fewer than one hundred employees and that has been in business for
more than ten (10) years;
7. One member, appointed by the Speaker of the House of
Representatives, who shall represent a business located in this

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1931 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

stat e with more than one hundred employees and that has been in
business for more than ten (10) years; and
8. The Chief Executive Officer of the Oklahoma Workforce
Commission.
B. Each Commissioner appointed to the Commission shall serve at
the pleasure of, and may be removed from office without cause by,
his or her appointing authority.
C. Any five Commissioners shall constitute a quorum. No
vacancy shall impair the right of the remaining Commissioners to
exercise all of the powers of the Commission.
SECTION 2. REPEALER 40 O.S. 2021, Section 4-105, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 3. REPEALER 40 O.S. 2021, Section 4-107, is
hereby repealed.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON ECONOMIC DEVELOPMENT, WORKFORCE
AND TOURISM
February 24, 2026 - DO PASS







SENATE FLOOR VERSION - SB1931 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)